lt-LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1410 Y 3
SFX 1410 as iausias/403 [^dt]as 123
SFX 1410 as žiausias/403 das 123
SFX 1410 tas čiausias/403 tas 123

SFX 1411 Y 3
SFX 1411 as iausias/404 [^dt]as 123
SFX 1411 as žiausias/404 das 123
SFX 1411 tas čiausias/404 tas 123

SFX 1427 Y 34
SFX 1427 ukas ukas . 37
SFX 1427 ukas uko . 38
SFX 1427 ukas ukui . 41
SFX 1427 ukas uką . 42
SFX 1427 ukas uku . 43
SFX 1427 ukas ukame . 44
SFX 1427 ukas ukam . 75
SFX 1427 ukas uk . 51
SFX 1427 ukas ukai . 39
SFX 1427 ukas ukų . 40
SFX 1427 ukas ukams . 45
SFX 1427 ukas ukam . 46
SFX 1427 ukas ukus . 47
SFX 1427 ukas ukais . 48
SFX 1427 ukas ukuose . 49
SFX 1427 ukas ukuos . 50
SFX 1427 ukas ukai . 55
SFX 1427 ukas ukė . 83
SFX 1427 ukas ukės . 84
SFX 1427 ukas ukei . 87
SFX 1427 ukas ukę . 88
SFX 1427 ukas uke . 89
SFX 1427 ukas ukėje . 90
SFX 1427 ukas ukėj . 91
SFX 1427 ukas uke . 98
SFX 1427 ukas ukės . 85
SFX 1427 ukas ukių . 86
SFX 1427 ukas ukėms . 92
SFX 1427 ukas ukėm . 93
SFX 1427 ukas ukes . 94
SFX 1427 ukas ukėmis . 95
SFX 1427 ukas ukėm . 96
SFX 1427 ukas ukėse . 97
SFX 1427 ukas ukės . 99

SFX 1435 Y 4
SFX 1435 ukas ukan . 52
SFX 1435 ukas ukuosna . 53
SFX 1435 ukas ukėn . 101
SFX 1435 ukas ukėsna . 102

SFX 1436 Y 2
SFX 1436 ukas uku . 54
SFX 1436 ukas uki . 103

SFX 1467 Y 255
SFX 1467 ias ias [^čž]ias 37
SFX 1467 ias io [^čž]ias 38
SFX 1467 ias iam [^čž]ias 41
SFX 1467 ias ią [^čž]ias 42
SFX 1467 ias iu [^čž]ias 43
SFX 1467 ias iame [^čž]ias 44
SFX 1467 ias iam [^čž]ias 75
SFX 1467 ias ias [^čž]ias 51
SFX 1467 ias i [^čž]ias 39
SFX 1467 ias ių [^čž]ias 40
SFX 1467 ias iems [^čž]ias 45
SFX 1467 ias iem [^čž]ias 46
SFX 1467 ias ius [^čž]ias 47
SFX 1467 ias iais [^čž]ias 48
SFX 1467 ias iuose [^čž]ias 49
SFX 1467 ias iuos [^čž]ias 50
SFX 1467 ias i [^čž]ias 55
SFX 1467 ias ia [^čž]ias 83
SFX 1467 ias ios [^čž]ias 84
SFX 1467 ias iai [^čž]ias 87
SFX 1467 ias ią [^čž]ias 88
SFX 1467 ias ia [^čž]ias 89
SFX 1467 ias ioje [^čž]ias 90
SFX 1467 ias ioj [^čž]ias 91
SFX 1467 ias ia [^čž]ias 98
SFX 1467 ias ios [^čž]ias 85
SFX 1467 ias ių [^čž]ias 86
SFX 1467 ias ioms [^čž]ias 92
SFX 1467 ias iom [^čž]ias 93
SFX 1467 ias ias [^čž]ias 94
SFX 1467 ias iomis [^čž]ias 95
SFX 1467 ias iom [^čž]ias 96
SFX 1467 ias iose [^čž]ias 97
SFX 1467 ias ios [^čž]ias 99
SFX 1467 ia ia [^čž]ia 83
SFX 1467 ia ios [^čž]ia 84
SFX 1467 ia iai [^čž]ia 87
SFX 1467 ia ią [^čž]ia 88
SFX 1467 ia ia [^čž]ia 89
SFX 1467 ia ioje [^čž]ia 90
SFX 1467 ia ioj [^čž]ia 91
SFX 1467 ia ia [^čž]ia 98
SFX 1467 ia ios [^čž]ia 85
SFX 1467 ia ių [^čž]ia 86
SFX 1467 ia ioms [^čž]ia 92
SFX 1467 ia iom [^čž]ia 93
SFX 1467 ia ias [^čž]ia 94
SFX 1467 ia iomis [^čž]ia 95
SFX 1467 ia iom [^čž]ia 96
SFX 1467 ia iose [^čž]ia 97
SFX 1467 ia ios [^čž]ia 99
SFX 1467 jas jas jas 37
SFX 1467 jas jo jas 38
SFX 1467 jas jam jas 41
SFX 1467 jas ją jas 42
SFX 1467 jas ju jas 43
SFX 1467 jas jame jas 44
SFX 1467 jas jam jas 75
SFX 1467 jas jas jas 51
SFX 1467 jas ji jas 39
SFX 1467 jas jų jas 40
SFX 1467 jas jiems jas 45
SFX 1467 jas jiem jas 46
SFX 1467 jas jus jas 47
SFX 1467 jas jais jas 48
SFX 1467 jas juose jas 49
SFX 1467 jas juos jas 50
SFX 1467 jas ji jas 55
SFX 1467 jas ja jas 83
SFX 1467 jas jos jas 84
SFX 1467 jas jai jas 87
SFX 1467 jas ją jas 88
SFX 1467 jas ja jas 89
SFX 1467 jas joje jas 90
SFX 1467 jas joj jas 91
SFX 1467 jas ja jas 98
SFX 1467 jas jos jas 85
SFX 1467 jas jų jas 86
SFX 1467 jas joms jas 92
SFX 1467 jas jom jas 93
SFX 1467 jas jas jas 94
SFX 1467 jas jomis jas 95
SFX 1467 jas jom jas 96
SFX 1467 jas jose jas 97
SFX 1467 jas jos jas 99
SFX 1467 ja ja ja 83
SFX 1467 ja jos ja 84
SFX 1467 ja jai ja 87
SFX 1467 ja ją ja 88
SFX 1467 ja ja ja 89
SFX 1467 ja joje ja 90
SFX 1467 ja joj ja 91
SFX 1467 ja ja ja 98
SFX 1467 ja jos ja 85
SFX 1467 ja jų ja 86
SFX 1467 ja joms ja 92
SFX 1467 ja jom ja 93
SFX 1467 ja jas ja 94
SFX 1467 ja jomis ja 95
SFX 1467 ja jom ja 96
SFX 1467 ja jose ja 97
SFX 1467 ja jos ja 99
SFX 1467 ias ias [^d]žias 37
SFX 1467 ias io [^d]žias 38
SFX 1467 ias iam [^d]žias 41
SFX 1467 ias ią [^d]žias 42
SFX 1467 ias iu [^d]žias 43
SFX 1467 ias iame [^d]žias 44
SFX 1467 ias iam [^d]žias 75
SFX 1467 ias ias [^d]žias 51
SFX 1467 ias i [^d]žias 39
SFX 1467 ias ių [^d]žias 40
SFX 1467 ias iems [^d]žias 45
SFX 1467 ias iem [^d]žias 46
SFX 1467 ias ius [^d]žias 47
SFX 1467 ias iais [^d]žias 48
SFX 1467 ias iuose [^d]žias 49
SFX 1467 ias iuos [^d]žias 50
SFX 1467 ias i [^d]žias 55
SFX 1467 ias ia [^d]žias 83
SFX 1467 ias ios [^d]žias 84
SFX 1467 ias iai [^d]žias 87
SFX 1467 ias ią [^d]žias 88
SFX 1467 ias ia [^d]žias 89
SFX 1467 ias ioje [^d]žias 90
SFX 1467 ias ioj [^d]žias 91
SFX 1467 ias ia [^d]žias 98
SFX 1467 ias ios [^d]žias 85
SFX 1467 ias ių [^d]žias 86
SFX 1467 ias ioms [^d]žias 92
SFX 1467 ias iom [^d]žias 93
SFX 1467 ias ias [^d]žias 94
SFX 1467 ias iomis [^d]žias 95
SFX 1467 ias iom [^d]žias 96
SFX 1467 ias iose [^d]žias 97
SFX 1467 ias ios [^d]žias 99
SFX 1467 ia ia [^d]žia 83
SFX 1467 ia ios [^d]žia 84
SFX 1467 ia iai [^d]žia 87
SFX 1467 ia ią [^d]žia 88
SFX 1467 ia ia [^d]žia 89
SFX 1467 ia ioje [^d]žia 90
SFX 1467 ia ioj [^d]žia 91
SFX 1467 ia ia [^d]žia 98
SFX 1467 ia ios [^d]žia 85
SFX 1467 ia ių [^d]žia 86
SFX 1467 ia ioms [^d]žia 92
SFX 1467 ia iom [^d]žia 93
SFX 1467 ia ias [^d]žia 94
SFX 1467 ia iomis [^d]žia 95
SFX 1467 ia iom [^d]žia 96
SFX 1467 ia iose [^d]žia 97
SFX 1467 ia ios [^d]žia 99
SFX 1467 džias džias . 37
SFX 1467 džias džio . 38
SFX 1467 džias džiam . 41
SFX 1467 džias džią . 42
SFX 1467 džias džiu . 43
SFX 1467 džias džiame . 44
SFX 1467 džias džiam . 75
SFX 1467 džias džias . 51
SFX 1467 džias di . 39
SFX 1467 džias džių . 40
SFX 1467 džias džiems . 45
SFX 1467 džias džiem . 46
SFX 1467 džias džius . 47
SFX 1467 džias džiais . 48
SFX 1467 džias džiuose . 49
SFX 1467 džias džiuos . 50
SFX 1467 džias di . 55
SFX 1467 džias džia . 83
SFX 1467 džias džios . 84
SFX 1467 džias džiai . 87
SFX 1467 džias džią . 88
SFX 1467 džias džia . 89
SFX 1467 džias džioje . 90
SFX 1467 džias džioj . 91
SFX 1467 džias džia . 98
SFX 1467 džias džios . 85
SFX 1467 džias džių . 86
SFX 1467 džias džioms . 92
SFX 1467 džias džiom . 93
SFX 1467 džias džias . 94
SFX 1467 džias džiomis . 95
SFX 1467 džias džiom . 96
SFX 1467 džias džiose . 97
SFX 1467 džias džios . 99
SFX 1467 džia džia . 83
SFX 1467 džia džios . 84
SFX 1467 džia džiai . 87
SFX 1467 džia džią . 88
SFX 1467 džia džia . 89
SFX 1467 džia džioje . 90
SFX 1467 džia džioj . 91
SFX 1467 džia džia . 98
SFX 1467 džia džios . 85
SFX 1467 džia džių . 86
SFX 1467 džia džioms . 92
SFX 1467 džia džiom . 93
SFX 1467 džia džias . 94
SFX 1467 džia džiomis . 95
SFX 1467 džia džiom . 96
SFX 1467 džia džiose . 97
SFX 1467 džia džios . 99
SFX 1467 čias čias . 37
SFX 1467 čias čio . 38
SFX 1467 čias čiam . 41
SFX 1467 čias čią . 42
SFX 1467 čias čiu . 43
SFX 1467 čias čiame . 44
SFX 1467 čias čiam . 75
SFX 1467 čias čias . 51
SFX 1467 čias ti . 39
SFX 1467 čias čių . 40
SFX 1467 čias tiems . 45
SFX 1467 čias tiem . 46
SFX 1467 čias čius . 47
SFX 1467 čias čiais . 48
SFX 1467 čias čiuose . 49
SFX 1467 čias čiuos . 50
SFX 1467 čias ti . 55
SFX 1467 čias čia . 83
SFX 1467 čias čios . 84
SFX 1467 čias čiai . 87
SFX 1467 čias čią . 88
SFX 1467 čias čia . 89
SFX 1467 čias čioje . 90
SFX 1467 čias čioj . 91
SFX 1467 čias čia . 98
SFX 1467 čias čios . 85
SFX 1467 čias čių . 86
SFX 1467 čias čioms . 92
SFX 1467 čias čiom . 93
SFX 1467 čias čias . 94
SFX 1467 čias čiomis . 95
SFX 1467 čias čiom . 96
SFX 1467 čias čiose . 97
SFX 1467 čias čios . 99
SFX 1467 čia čia . 83
SFX 1467 čia čios . 84
SFX 1467 čia čiai . 87
SFX 1467 čia čią . 88
SFX 1467 čia čia . 89
SFX 1467 čia čioje . 90
SFX 1467 čia čioj . 91
SFX 1467 čia čia . 98
SFX 1467 čia čios . 85
SFX 1467 čia čių . 86
SFX 1467 čia čioms . 92
SFX 1467 čia čiom . 93
SFX 1467 čia čias . 94
SFX 1467 čia čiomis . 95
SFX 1467 čia čiom . 96
SFX 1467 čia čiose . 97
SFX 1467 čia čios . 99

AF 1467,1767,1769,1775,1781,1784,1787,1790,1841,9999 # 40
AF 1427,9999 # 80
AF 1323,1331,1383,1387,1391,1392,1397,1398,1400,1401,1403,1404,1406,1407,1409,1410,9999 # 94
AF 1467,1475,1767,1769,1775,1776,1781,1782,1784,1785,1787,1788,1790,1791,1841,1842,9999 # 321
AF 1467,1767,1775,9999 # 325
AF 1467,1767,1775,1781,1784,1841,9999 # 339
