lt-LT.dic
abuojas/40	8
aklutukas/80	8
amžinas/94	8
ankstyvas/94	8
artimas/94	8
atgalias/40	8
atpakalias/40	8
atsijas/40	8
atskiras/94	8
atviras/94	8
atvirkščias/40	8
atžagarias/40	8
aukštas/94	8
baltas/94	8
bendras/94	8
bergždžias/40	8
blogas/94	8
būtinas/94	8
dažnas/94	8
dvasingas/94	8
geltonas/94	8
geras/94	8
gimtas/94	8
greitas/94	8
griežtas/94	8
grynas/94	8
gulsčias/40	8
gyvas/94	8
ilgas/94	8
išvirkščias/40	8
jaunas/94	8
juodas/94	8
karštas/94	8
keistas/94	8
keturpėsčias/40	8
kietas/94	8
klūpsčias/40	8
kniūbsčias/40	8
kniūpsčias/40	8
kupinas/94	8
kurčias/40	8
kūlvirsčias/40	8
laikinas/94	8
laimingas/94	8
laisvas/94	8
lengvas/94	8
lietuviškas/94	8
liūdnas/94	8
mažas/94	8
mažiukas/80	8
mažuliukas/80	8
mažučiukas/80	8
menkas/94	8
mielas/94	8
minkštas/94	8
mėlynas/94	8
naudingas/94	8
naujas/321	8
neatvirkščias/325	8
nebenaujas/40	8
nebepėsčias/325	8
nebergždžias/40	8
nebetuščias/325	8
nebešlapias/325	8
nebešviežias/325	8
nedidukas/80	8
negeras/94	8
negulsčias/40	8
negyvas/94	8
nekurčias/339	8
nelengvas/94	8
nemažas/94	8
nemažiukas/80	8
nenaujas/40	8
nenėščia/325	8
neplokščias/40	8
nepėsčias/40	8
nestačias/40	8
nesveikas/94	8
neteisingas/94	8
netikėtas/94	8
netuščias/339	8
nešlapias/40	8
nešviežias/40	8
nežalias/40	8
nėščia/40	8
paplokščias/40	8
paprastas/94	8
pastaras/94	8
pavojingas/94	8
piktas/94	8
pilkas/94	8
pilnas/94	8
pirmas/94	8
plokščias/40	8
plonas/94	8
prastas/94	8
pėsčias/40	8
raudonas/94	8
reikalingas/94	8
retas/94	8
rimtas/94	8
rudas/94	8
sausas/94	8
savitas/94	8
senas/94	8
senučiukas/80	8
siauras/94	8
silpnas/94	8
skiausčias/40	8
skirtingas/94	8
slaptas/94	8
stačias/40	8
storas/94	8
sveikas/94	8
svetimas/94	8
svečias/339	8
teisingas/94	8
tikras/94	8
tobulas/94	8
tolimas/94	8
trumpas/94	8
turtingas/94	8
tuščias/321	8
tvirtas/94	8
vaisingas/94	8
vakarykščias/40	8
vertas/94	8
vienas/94	8
vienišas/94	8
vienodas/94	8
viešas/94	8
vėlyvas/94	8
ypatingas/94	8
įvijas/40	8
šaltas/94	8
šiltas/94	8
šlapias/40	8
šventas/94	8
šviežias/40	8
žalias/321	8
žemas/94	8
